Connecticut, session 2026, SB00274.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
1 Section 1. Section 47a-6a of the general statutes is repealed and the
2 following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
3 (a) As used in this section: [,]
4 (1) ["address"] "Address" means a location as described by the full
5 street number, if any, the street name, the city or town, and the state,
6 and not a mailing address such as a post office box; [,]
7 (2) ["dwelling unit"] "Dwelling unit" means any house or building, or
8 portion thereof, which is rented, leased or hired out to be occupied, or
9 is arranged or designed to be occupied, or is occupied, as the home or
10 residence of one or more persons, living independently of each other,
11 and doing their cooking upon the premises, and having a common right
12 in the halls, stairways or yards; [,]
SB274 / File No. 153 1

SB274 File No. 153
13 (3) ["agent in charge"] "Agent in charge" or "agent" means [one] an
14 individual who manages real [estate] property, including, but not
15 limited to, the collection of rents, [and] supervision and maintenance of
16 such property, and ensuring such property complies with state and local
17 codes;
18 (4) ["controlling participant"] "Controlling participant" means an
19 individual [that] who exercises day-to-day financial or operational
20 control; [, and]
21 (5) ["project-based housing provider"] "Project-based housing
22 provider" means a property owner who contracts with the United States
23 Department of Housing and Urban Development to provide housing to
24 tenants under the federal Housing Choice Voucher Program, 42 USC
25 1437f(o);
26 (6) "Identifying information" means proof of an individual's name,
27 date of birth, current residential address, motor vehicle operator's
28 license number or other identification number issued by any
29 government agency or entity;
30 (7) "Nonresident owner" means an individual, corporation,
31 partnership, trust or other legally recognized entity, who does not reside
32 at rental real property, who is (A) an owner, as defined in section 47a-1,
33 of such real property, or (B) the controlling participant of the entity that
34 owns such real property; and
35 (8) "Population" means the number of persons according to the most
36 recent federal decennial census.
37 (b) Any municipality with a population of fewer than twenty-five
38 thousand may, and any municipality with a population of twenty-five
39 thousand or more shall, require the nonresident owner or project-based
40 housing provider of occupied or vacant rental real property to report to
41 the tax assessor, or other municipal [office] officer designated by the
42 municipality, the current residential address of the (1) nonresident
43 owner or project-based housing provider of such property, if the
SB274 / File No. 153 2

SB274 File No. 153
44 nonresident owner or project-based housing provider is an individual,
45 or [the current residential address of the] (2) agent in charge of the
46 building, if the nonresident owner or project-based housing provider is
47 a corporation, partnership, trust or other legally recognized entity.
48 [owning rental real property in the state.] If [the] a nonresident [owners]
49 owner or project-based housing [providers are] provider is a
50 corporation, partnership, trust or other legally recognized entity,
51 [owning rental real property in the state,] such report shall also include
52 identifying information and the current residential address of each
53 controlling participant associated with the property. If such residential
54 address changes, [notice of] the new residential address shall be
55 [provided] reported by such nonresident owner, project-based housing
56 provider or agent in charge of the building to the office of the tax
57 assessor or other designated municipal [office] officer not more than
58 twenty-one days after the date that the address change occurred. If the
59 nonresident owner, project-based housing provider or agent fails to
60 [file] report an address under this section, the address to which the
61 municipality mails property tax bills for the rental real property shall be
62 deemed to be the nonresident owner, project-based housing provider or
63 agent's current address. Such address may be used for compliance with
64 the provisions of subsection [(c)] (d) of this section.
65 (c) In addition to the residential address required pursuant to
66 subsection (b) of this section, any municipality with a population of
67 twenty-five thousand or more shall require the nonresident owner,
68 project-based housing provider or agent in charge, as applicable, to
69 report to the tax assessor, or other municipal officer designated by the
70 municipality, accurate identifying information concerning such
71 nonresident owner, project-based housing provider or agent in charge.
72 [(c)] (d) Service of a state or municipal [orders] order relating to the
73 maintenance of such rental real property or compliance with state law
74 and local codes concerning such real property directed to the
75 nonresident owner, project-based housing provider or agent at the
76 address [on file,] reported by such owner, provider or agent or deemed
77 to be [on file in accordance with the provisions of this section] such
SB274 / File No. 153 3

SB274 File No. 153
78 owner, provider or agent's address, shall be sufficient proof of service
79 of notice of such [orders] order in any subsequent criminal or civil action
80 against the owner, project-based housing provider or agent for failure
81 to comply with [the orders] such order. The provisions of this section
82 shall not be construed to limit the validity of any other means of giving
83 notice of such orders that may be used by the state or such municipality.
84 [(d) Any person who violates] (e) A violation of any provision of this
85 section shall [have committed an infraction] be punishable by a fine
86 pursuant to the provisions of section 47a-6b.
87 [(e)] (f) Any report provided to a tax assessor pursuant to subsection
88 (b) or (c) of this section [on or after October 1, 2023,] shall be confidential
89 and shall not be disclosed under chapter 14.
90 Sec. 2. Subsection (a) of section 47a-7 of the general statutes is
91 repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October
92 1, 2026):
93 (a) A landlord shall: (1) Comply with the requirements of chapter
94 368o and all applicable building and housing codes materially affecting
95 health and safety of both the state or any political subdivision thereof;
96 (2) make all repairs and do whatever is necessary to put and keep the
97 premises in a fit and habitable condition, except where the premises are
98 intentionally rendered unfit or uninhabitable by the tenant, a member
99 of [his] such tenant's family or other person on the premises with [his]
100 such tenant's consent, in which case such duty shall be the responsibility
101 of [the] such tenant; (3) keep all common areas of the premises in a clean
102 and safe condition; (4) maintain in good and safe working order and
103 condition all electrical, plumbing, sanitary, heating, ventilating and
104 other facilities and appliances and elevators, supplied or required to be
105 supplied by [him] such tenant; (5) provide and maintain appropriate
106 receptacles for the removal of ashes, garbage, rubbish and other waste
107 incidental to the occupancy of the dwelling unit and arrange for their
108 removal; [and] (6) supply running water and reasonable amounts of hot
109 water at all times and reasonable heat except if the building which
110 includes the dwelling unit is not required by law to be equipped for that
SB274 / File No. 153 4

SB274 File No. 153
111 purpose or if the dwelling unit is so constructed that heat or hot water
112 is generated by an installation within the exclusive control of the tenant
113 or supplied by a direct public utility connection; and (7) comply with
114 the requirements of section 47a-6a, as amended by this act.
115 Sec. 3. Section 29-254a of the general statutes is repealed and the
116 following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
117 Any person who violates any provision of the State Building Code
118 shall, for the first offense, be fined not less than two hundred dollars or
119 more than one thousand dollars or imprisoned not more than six
120 months, or both, and, for any subsequent offense, be fined not less than
121 five hundred dollars or more than two thousand dollars.
122 Sec. 4. Subsection (e) of section 29-291c of the general statutes is
123 repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October
124 1, 2026):
125 (e) In addition to the fine prescribed in subsection (a) of this section,
126 any person who violates any provision of the State Fire Prevention Code
127 or Fire Safety Code shall, for a first offense, be fined not less than two
128 hundred dollars or more than one thousand dollars or be imprisoned
129 not more than six months, or both, and, for any subsequent offense, be
130 fined not less than five hundred dollars or more than one thousand
131 dollars.
132 Sec. 5. Section 29-394 of the general statutes is repealed and the
133 following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
134 Any person who, by [himself or his] such person or such person's
135 agent, fails to comply with the written order of a building inspector for
136 the provision of additional exit facilities in a building, the repair or
137 alteration of a building or the removal of a building or any portion
138 thereof, shall, for a first offense, be fined not less than two hundred
139 dollars nor more than one thousand dollars or imprisoned not more
140 than six months, or both, and, for any subsequent offense, be fined not
141 less than five hundred dollars or more than two thousand dollars.
SB274 / File No. 153 5

SB274 File No. 153
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 October 1, 2026 47a-6a
Sec. 2 October 1, 2026 47a-7(a)
Sec. 3 October 1, 2026 29-254a
Sec. 4 October 1, 2026 29-291c(e)
Sec. 5 October 1, 2026 29-394
PD Joint Favorable
SB274 / File No. 153 6

SB274 File No. 153
The following Fiscal Impact Statement and Bill Analysis are prepared for the benefit of the members of
the General Assembly, solely for purposes of information, summarization and explanation and do not
represent the intent of the General Assembly or either chamber thereof for any purpose. In general,
fiscal impacts are based upon a variety of informational sources, including the analyst’s professional
knowledge. Whenever applicable, agency data is consulted as part of the analysis, however final
products do not necessarily reflect an assessment from any specific department.
OFA Fiscal Note
State Impact:
Agency Affected Fund-Effect FY 27 $ FY 28 $
Resources of the General Fund GF - Potential Minimal Minimal
Revenue Gain
Note: GF=General Fund
Municipal Impact:
Municipalities Effect FY 27 $ FY 28 $
Various Municipalities Potential Minimal Minimal
Revenue
Gain
Explanation
The bill (1) makes various changes regarding reporting requirements
for property owners and landlords which results in a potential revenue
gain to municipalities beginning in FY 27, and (2) increases fines for fire
and building code violations which results in a potential revenue gain
to the state beginning in FY 27.
Sections 1 and 2 require municipalities with a population of 25,000
or more to require certain residential property owners and landlords to
report information to the municipality and establishes that failure to do
so will result in a penalty of up to $500 for a first violation and up to
$1,000 for subsequent violations.1 This results in a potential minimal
revenue gain to municipalities beginning in FY 27 to the extent these
1 According to the CT Department of Health population estimates, in 2024 there were
46 municipalities in Connecticut with a population of 25,000 or more.
SB274 / File No. 153 7

SB274 File No. 153
penalties are imposed and collected.
Sections 3 to 5 increase the fines for second and subsequent
violations of certain fire and building code sections, resulting in a
minimal potential revenue gain to the state.2
The Out Years
The annualized ongoing fiscal impact identified above would
continue into the future subject to the number of violations.
2 Between FY 22 and FY 25, there were a total 296 offenses recorded and $2,000 in fines
collected under CGS §§ 29-254a, 29-291c, and 29-394.
SB274 / File No. 153 8

SB274 File No. 153
OLR Bill Analysis
SB 274
AN ACT CONCERNING NONRESIDENT LANDLORD
REGISTRATION AND INCREASING PENALTIES FOR REPEAT
BUILDING AND FIRE CODE VIOLATIONS.